Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.56.068

Possession of stolen vehicle.

(1) A person is guilty of possession of a stolen vehicle if he or she possess [possesses] a stolen motor vehicle.

(2) Possession of a stolen motor vehicle is a class B felony.

[ 2007 c 199 s 5.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Short title—2007 c 199: See notes following RCW 9A.56.065.